da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computer – tilbehør: Computertilbehørssæt; Computercovers; Computerholdere og -standere; Computer-sikkerhedslåse; Håndholdt enhed – tilbehør; Tastatur og mus – håndledsstøtter; Tastatur – klistermærker og decals; Tastaturbakker og -holdere; Bærbar computer – dockingstationer; Musemåtter; Styluspen – spidser og genopfyldning; Styluspenne; Stativer og standere til tablets
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни аксесоари: Комплекти компютърни аксесоари; Компютърни калъфи и покрития; Основи за повдигане на компютри и стойки; Заключващи устройства за компютър; Аксесоари за преносими устройства; Подложки за китки за клавиатура и мишка; Стикери и ваденки за клавиатура; Поставки и платформи за клавиатури; Докинг станции за лаптоп; Подложки за мишка; Накрайници и пълнители за стилус писалки; Стилус писалки; Докинг станции и стойки за таблетни компютри
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机配件: 计算机配件套装; 计算机保护套/保护罩; 笔记本/显示器支架和底座; 电脑防盗锁; 手持装置配件; 键盘/鼠标护腕垫; 键盘贴纸和贴花; 键盘托架; 笔记本扩展底座; 鼠标垫; 触控笔笔尖/笔芯; 触控笔; 平板电脑座/支架
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Aksesuarları: Bilgisayar Aksesuar Setleri; Bilgisayar Kılıfları; Bilgisayar Yükselticiler ve Stantları; Bilgisayar Güvenlik Kilitleri; Elde Taşınabilir Cihaz Aksesuarları; Klavye ve Fare Bilek Destekleri; Klavye Çıkartmaları ve Etiketleri; Klavye Sephaları ve Platformları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Kenetleme İstasyonları; Fare Altlıkları; Stylus Kalem Uçları ve Refilleri; Stylus Kalemler; Tablet Bilgisayar Kızakları ve Standları
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Tilbehør til datamaskiner: Tilbehørssett for datamaskiner; Deksler og trekk til datamaskin; Datamaskinstativer; Datasikkerhetslåser; Tilbehør for håndholdte enheter; Håndleddsstøtter for tastatur og mus; Tastaturklistremerker og dekaler; Tastaturstativer og -plattformer; Dockingstasjoner for bærbare datamaskiner; Musematter; Tupper og refills for styluspenner; Styluspenner; Docker og stativer for nettbrett
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Accesorii calculatoare: Seturi de accesorii calculatoare; Carcase și skinuri pentru computere; Sisteme de înălțare și suporturi pentru computer; Lacăte de securitate pentru calculatoare; Accesorii pentru dispozitive portabile; Suport pentru încheietură pentru tastatură și mouse; Stickere și autocolante pentru tastatură; Sertare și platforme pentru tastatură; Stații de andocare pentru laptop; Suporturi pentru mouse; Vârfuri stylus și rezerve; Stylus-uri; Suporturi de andocare și standuri pentru tablete
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datortillbehör: Tillbehörspaket för datorer; Datorskal och -fodral; Datorupphöjare; Datorsäkerhetslås; Tillbehör till handhållna enheter; Handledsstöd för tangentbord och möss; Tangentbordsklistermärken och dekaler; Tangentbords- och mushyllor; Dockningsstationer för bärbara datorer; Musmattor; Spetsar och påfyllning för pekpennor; Pekpennor; Dockning och stativ för surfplattor
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Akcesoria komputerowe: Zestawy akcesoriów komputerowych; Pokrowce i futerały na komputery; Podnośniki do monitorów i stoliki na laptopy; Zamki zabezpieczające do komputerów; Akcesoria do palmtopów; Podpórki pod nadgarstki do klawiatur i myszek; Naklejki i folie dekoracyjne na klawiaturę; Podstawki pod klawiaturę i myszkę; Stacje dokujące do laptopów; Podkładki pod myszki; Wymienne stalówki do rysików; Rysiki; Stacje dokujące i stojaki na tablety
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные аксессуары: Наборы компьютерных аксессуаров; Декоративные чехлы и наклейки для компьютеров; Подставки для компьютеров; Замки безопасности для компьютеров; Аксессуары для портативных устройств; Подставки под запястья для клавиатуры и мыши; Наклейки и декали для клавиатур; Подставки и полки для клавиатуры; Док-станции для ноутбуков; Коврики для мыши; Наконечники для стилусов; Стилусы; Док-станции и подставки для планшетных компьютеров
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítače – příslušenství: Sady příslušenství k počítačům; Obaly a pouzdra na počítače; Podstavce a stojany pro počítače; Bezpečnostní zámky pro počítače; Přenosná zařízení – příslušenství; Opěrky zápěstí ke klávesnicím a myším; Samolepky a nálepky na klávesnice; Zásuvky a držáky pro klávesnice; Dokovací stanice k notebookům; Podložky pod myš; Náhradní hroty do stylusů; Stylusy; Doky a stojánky pro tablety
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių priedai: Kompiuterių priedų rinkiniai; Kompiuterių gaubtai ir apvalkalai; Kompiuterių pakylos ir stovai; Kompiuterių apsaugos užraktai; Delninių įrenginių priedai; Klaviatūros ir pelės riešo atramos; Klaviatūrų lipdukai ir dekalai; Klaviatūrų padėklai ir platformos; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių jungčių stotelės; Pelių kilimėliai; Šviesinių rašiklių antgaliai ir užpildai; Šviesiniai rašikliai; Planšetinių kompiuterių jungčių stotelės ir stovai
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Dodatna oprema za računala: Setovi računalne opreme; Navlake i maske za računala; Podizači i stalci za računala; Sigurnosne brave za računala; Pribor za ručne uređaje; Nasloni za ručni zglob za tipkovnicu i miš; Naljepnice za tipkovnice; Ladice i platforme za tipkovnicu; Priključne stanice za prijenosna računala; Podloge za miš; Pera i punjenja za stylus olovke; Stylus olovke; Priključne stanice i stalci za tablet
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Acessórios de computador: Conjuntos de acessórios de computador; Capas e proteções de computador; Apoios e extensores de computador; Bloqueios de segurança para computador; Acessórios de dispositivo portátil; Apoios de pulso de teclado e rato; Autocolantes e decalques para teclado; Plataformas e tabuleiros de teclado; Estações de ancoragem de portátil; Tapetes de rato; Pontas e recargas de estiletes; Estiletes; Apoios e docas de tablet
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Accesorios informáticos: Sets de accesorios para computadoras; Fundas para computadoras; Bases y elevadores para computadoras; Cerraduras de seguridad para computadoras; Accesorios para dispositivos portátiles; Reposamuñecas para teclado y ratón; Pegatinas y calcomanías para teclado; Plataformas y bandejas para teclados; Estaciones de conexión para portátiles; Alfombrillas de ratón; Almohadillas y recambios de lápiz óptico; Lápices ópticos; Bases para tablets
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 부대용품: 컴퓨터 부대용품 세트; 컴퓨터 커버; 컴퓨터 라이저/스탠드; 컴퓨터 보안 잠금장치; 휴대용 기기 부대용품; 키보드/마우스 손목 받침대; 키보드 스티커 및 데칼; 키보드 받침대; 노트북 도킹 스테이션; 마우스 패드; 스타일러스 펜 볼/리필; 스타일러스 펜; 태블릿 컴퓨터 독/거치대
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Accessori per computer: Set di accessori per computer; Cover e protezioni per computer; Alzate e supporti per computer; Lucchetti di sicurezza per computer; Accessori dispositivi portatili; Poggiapolsi per tastiera e mouse; Adesivi e decalcomanie della tastiera; Supporti per tastiera; Docking station laptop; Tappetini per il mouse; pennini e ricariche per penne stilografiche; Penne stylus; Dock e supporti per tablet
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerzubehör: Computerzubehör-Sets; Computer-Schutzhüllen; Computer-Monitorständer; Computer-Sicherheitsschlösser; Zubehör für E-Book-Reader & Handheld-Computer; Tastatur- & Maus-Handballenauflage; Tastaturaufkleber und -Abziehbilder; Tastaturablagen; Laptop-Dockingstationen; Mousepads; Ersatzspitzen für Stylus Pens; Stylus Pens; Ständer für Tablet-PCs
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniška oprema: Kompleti računalniške opreme; Računalniški ovitki in prevleke; Računalniški podstavki in stojala; Varnostne ključavnice za računalnike; Dodatki za ročne naprave; Nasloni za zapestje za tipkovnice in miške; Nalepke za tipkovnice; Plošče in platforme za tipkovnice; Priključne postaje za prenosne računalnike; Podloge za miške; Konice in polnila za digitalna peresa; Digitalna peresa; Priključki in stojala za tablične računalnike
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦配件: 電腦配件套組; 電腦保護殼/保護套; 電腦托架; 電腦安全鎖; 手持裝置配件; 鍵盤滑鼠護手腕墊; 鍵盤貼紙與貼花; 鍵盤托盤/鍵盤座; 筆記型電腦擴充基座; 滑鼠墊; 觸控筆替換筆尖和筆芯; 觸控筆; 平板座/立架
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Accessoires pour ordinateurs: Ensembles d’accessoires pour ordinateurs; Coques et skins pour ordinateurs; Supports pour ordinateurs; Verrous de sécurité pour ordinateur; Accessoires pour appareils mobiles; Repose-poignets pour clavier et souris; Autocollants et décalcomanies pour clavier; Tablettes de clavier; Stations d’accueil pour ordinateurs portables; Tapis de souris; Pointes et recharges pour stylets; Stylets; Stations d’accueil et supports pour tablette
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeraccessoires: Accessoiresets voor computers; Computertassen en -hoezen; Computerverhogers en -standaards; Beveiligingssloten voor computers; Accessoires voor handheldapparaten; Polssteunen voor toetsenbord en muis; Toetsenbord stickers en decals; Toetsenbordladen en -platforms; Dockingstations voor laptops; Muismatten; Balpenpunten en -vullingen; Styluspennen; Docks en standaarden voor tabletcomputers
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện máy tính: Bộ phụ kiện máy tính; Vỏ/bao máy tính; Giá đỡ màn hình và kệ máy tính; Khóa bảo mật máy tính; Phụ kiện thiết bị cầm tay; Kê tay bàn phím và chuột; Nhãn dán và decal bàn phím; Khay và bệ bàn phím; Hộp cắm mở rộng cho laptop; Bàn di chuột; Ngòi bi bút cảm ứng và ngòi thay thế; Bút cảm ứng stylus; Giá và đế máy tính bảng
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Accessories: Computer Accessory Sets; Computer Covers & Skins; Computer Risers & Stands; Computer Security Locks; Handheld Device Accessories; Keyboard & Mouse Wrist Rests; Keyboard Stickers & Decals; Keyboard Trays & Platforms; Laptop Docking Stations; Mouse Pads; Stylus Pen Nibs & Refills; Stylus Pens; Tablet Computer Docks & Stands
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Acessórios para computadores: Conjuntos de acessórios para computador; Estojos e capas para computador; Suportes para computador; Travas de segurança para computador; Acessórios para dispositivos portáteis; Descansos de pulso para teclado e mouse; Adesivos e decalques para teclado; Bandejas e plataformas para teclado; Bases para laptops; Mouse Pads; Pontas e recargas para canetas Stylus; Canetas Stylus; Suportes e docas para tablets
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์: ชุดอุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์; ปกแล็ปท็อปและแท็บเล็ต; ที่ตั้งคอมพิวเตอร์; ล็อคกันขโมยคอมพิวเตอร์; อุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องมือถือ; ที่วางข้อมือสำหรับใช้กับคีย์บอร์ดและเมาส์; สติกเกอร์และลายฉลากคีย์บอร์ด; ถาดและที่วางคีย์บอร์ด; Docking Station ของแล็ปท็อป; ที่รองเมาส์; ปลายปากกาและไส้สำหรับปากกาสไตลัส; ปากกาสไตลัส; แท่นและที่ตั้งคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC周辺機器: コンピュータ アクセサリー セット; PCカバー・ケース; PCスタンド; コンピューター用セキュリティロック; 携帯端末・PDA周辺機器; PCキーボード・マウス用リストレスト; キーボード用ステッカー・デカール; PCキーボードトレイ; ノートPC用ドッキングステーション; マウスパッド; スタイラスペン用ペン先・リフィル; スタイラスペン; タブレット PC ドック/スタンド
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonetarvikkeet: Tietokonetarvikepaketit; Tietokoneen suojakotelot ja -pussit; Tietokonejalustat ja -telineet; Tietoturvalukot; Mobiililaitteiden lisätarvikkeet; Näppäimistön ja hiiren rannetuet; Näppäimistötarrat ja -tarralehdet; Näppäimistöalustat ja -telineet; Kannettavan tietokoneen telakat; Hiirimatot; Kosketusnäyttökynien kärjet ja vaihtosäiliöt; Kosketusnäyttökynät; Tablettitietokoneen telakat ja telineet
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-kiegészítők: Számítógép-kiegészítőkészletek; Számítógép-huzatok és -borítók; Számítógép-emelők és -állványok; Számítógép biztonsági zárak; Kézieszköz-kiegészítők; Billentyűzet-és egércsuklótámaszok; Billentyűzetmatricák és -díszek; Billentyűzettálcák és -platformok; Laptopdokkoló-állomások; Egérpadok; Stylus tollhegyek és utántöltők; Stylus tollak; Táblagép-dokkok és -állványok
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ υπολογιστών: Σετ αξεσουάρ υπολογιστών; Καλύμματα & προστατευτικά αξεσουάρ (skins) υπολογιστών; Ανυψωτικά & βάσεις υπολογιστών; Κλειδαριές ασφαλείας υπολογιστών; Αξεσουάρ φορητών συσκευών; Μαξιλαράκια υποστήριξης καρπού για πληκτρολόγια & ποντίκια; Αυτοκόλλητα και διακοσμητικά για πληκτρολόγια; Δίσκοι & πλατφόρμες πληκτρολογίου; Σταθμοί σύνδεσης φορητών υπολογιστών; Βάσεις για ποντίκια (Mouse Pads); Ανταλλακτικές μύτες & γεμίσματα στυλό αφής; Στυλό αφής; Βάσεις & σταθμοί σύνδεσης τάμπλετ
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové príslušenstvo: Súpravy počítačového príslušenstva; Počítačové kryty a obaly; Počítačové podstavce a stojany; Počítačové bezpečnostné zámky; Príslušenstvo pre ručné zariadenia; Opierky zápästia pre klávesnice a myši; Nálepky a samolepky na klávesnice; Zásuvky a platformy pre klávesnicu; Dokovacie stanice pre stolné počítače; Podložky pod myš; Hroty a náplne dotykového pera; Dotykové perá; Doky a stojany na tablety